Maine, session 132, LD1181.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §4364-C, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 672, §7, is
amended to read:
2. Municipalities may regulate short-term rentals. A municipality may establish
and enforce regulations regarding short-term rental units in order to achieve the statewide
or regional housing production goal, including regulations requiring the municipal assessor
to assign a land use code to a short-term rental unit that designates the short-term rental
unit as commercial in use or residential in use. For the purposes of this subsection, "short-
term rental unit" means living quarters offered for rental through a transient rental platform
as defined by Title 36, section 1752, subsection 20‑C. For purposes of this subsection,
"commercial in use" means a short-term rental unit that is not claimed as the primary
residence of the owner. For purposes of this subsection, "residential in use" means a
short-term rental unit that is claimed as the primary residence of the owner.